Massachusetts, session 194th, S2105.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subclause 26, in lines 146 to 158, inclusive, of Section 7 of Chapter 4 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “section 1 of chapter 32,” in line 157, the following words: “or office of the governor. “
SECTION 2. Subclause 26 of Section 7 of Chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting after “in section 10A of
chapter sixty-six” in line 273, the following sentence: “This section applies to records of the
office of the governor created or received after noon on January 6, 2025.”
of 1